Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-207
Guests, defined.

Guests shall mean and include all persons who have registered on a register provided for such purpose by hotels, motels, and rooming houses, whether assigned a room or rooms or not, occupants of apartments, patrons of restaurants, or persons who have signified their intention in writing to become a guest of such hotel, restaurant, apartment house, motel, or rooming house.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 7.